Tennessee, session 114, HB1935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 5, Part 14, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A city or county collecting official shall not require a taxpayer to pay the full tax
due for an assessment for which an appeal is pending before the county or state boards
of equalization.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1935
010987
- 1 -